Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1685, as


amended by Section 165, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1685), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1685. A. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously


torture, destroy or kill, or cruelly beat or injure, maim or


mutilate any animal in subjugation or captivity, whether wild or


tame, and whether belonging to the person or to another, or deprive


any such animal of necessary food, drink, shelter, or veterinary


care to prevent suffering; or who shall cause, procure or permit any


such animal to be so tortured, destroyed or killed, or cruelly


beaten or injured, maimed or mutilated, or deprived of necessary

Req. No. 3165 Page 1


food, drink, shelter, or veterinary care to prevent suffering; or


who shall willfully set on foot, instigate, engage in, or in any way


further any act of cruelty to any animal, or any act tending to


produce such cruelty, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class


B5 felony offense and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment


in the State Penitentiary not exceeding custody of the Department of


Corrections for not more than five (5) years, or by imprisonment in


the county jail for not exceeding more than one (1) year, or by a


fine not exceeding more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). Any


animal so maltreated or abused shall be considered an abused or


neglected animal.


B. The Department of Corrections shall create a searchable


database on its website of the names of individuals who have been


convicted of, or who have entered a plea of guilty or nolo


contendere to, a violation of this section. The Department shall


promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3165 CN 1/5/2026 9:13:03 AM











Req. No. 3165 Page 2